apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="big/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -g and add -ger and -gest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ger</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hot/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -t and add -ter and -test to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="thin/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -n and add -ner and -nest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dim/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -m and add -mer and -mest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="common/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or adding -er and -est (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lovel/y__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or deleting -y and adding -ier and -iest (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ier</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="handsome/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or directly adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/good__adj">
      <e c="CP: good comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>good</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>better</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/bad__adj">
      <e c="CP: bad comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>bad</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>worse</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>worst</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ar__adj">
      <e c="CP: far comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urther</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>arther</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urthest</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>arthest</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="glad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="broad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either adding -er and -est or with more and the most (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drab/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="flat/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="truthful" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>truthful</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abrupt" a="eleka"><i>abrupt</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bad">      <i/>      <par n="/bad__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="good">      <i/>      <par n="/good__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="abstract"><i>abstract</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="alive"><i>alive</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="aware"><i>aware</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="awful"><i>awful</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="big"><i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bitter"><i>bitter</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="blatant"><i>blatant</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="broad"><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="civil"><i>civil</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="common"><i>common</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="discreet"><i>discreet</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="exact"><i>exact</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="extreme"><i>extreme</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fat"><i>fat</i><par n="hot/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fit"><i>fit</i><par n="hot/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flat"><i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fragile"><i>fragile</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="glad"><i>glad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="grim"><i>grim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="handsome"><i>handsome</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="honest"><i>honest</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hot"><i>hot</i><par n="hot/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="human"><i>human</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="immortal"><i>immortal</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="intact"><i>intact</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="irregular"><i>irregular</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="likely"><i>likel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mellow"><i>mellow</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="modern"><i>modern</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="modest"><i>modest</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="moral"><i>moral</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pale"><i>pale</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="profound"><i>profound</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="random"><i>random</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="rapid"><i>rapid</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="real"><i>real</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="right"><i>right</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ripe"><i>ripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="robust"><i>robust</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sad"><i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="serious"><i>serious</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="severe"><i>severe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="silent"><i>silent</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="slim"><i>slim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="spare"><i>spare</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="straight" a="doriua"><i>straight</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="strict"><i>strict</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="thin/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="timely"><i>timel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="unlikely"><i>unlikel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="unripe"><i>unripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="upward"><i>upward</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wet" a="doriua"><i>wet</i><par n="hot/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wrong"><i>wrong</i><par n="common/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="elderly"><i>elderl</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="truthful" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>truthful</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="khaki"><i>khaki</i><par n="common/__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="ochre"><i>ochre</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="blessed" a="greenbreen"><i>blessed</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stable" a="greenbreen"><i>stable</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mute" a="greenbreen"><i>mute</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="glib" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>glib</i><par n="drab/__adj"/></e>
